engine/dictionaries/fa_IR/fa-IR.dic
آلاء/sasosl
آنیموس/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
آوا/pasbsqsdsesfsvsn
آوانتاژ/pasasosdsesfslsj
آگاه/sasrslsgsistsu
آگاهانه/scspsksgsisu
آگه/pascspsgshsisl
آیین‌دان/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
اباقاخان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
اتساع/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
اتومبیلچه/pascspsgshsismsk
اتکاپذیری/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
اثاث/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
احادیث/sasosl
اخترواره/pascspsgshsismsk
ارزنده/scspsksgsisu
استغنایی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
اسد/pasasosdsesfslsj
اسیدزا/sbsqsvsnsdsfst
اصطلاح/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
اصغریان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
اصلاح/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
اطناب/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
اعتبارسنجی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
اعتدالا/pasbsqsdsesfsvsn
افکن/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
اقامه/pascspsgshsismsk
اقیانوس/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
الصباح/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
المپیک/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
امیراسدالله/pasasrsgshsislsdsesf
انترنی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
انگیزنده/pascspsgshsismsk
اوکراینی/scspsmsgsisusdsf
اکبرنژاد/pasasosdsesfslsj
اکونومیک/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
اگزوپری/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
ایستا/sbsqsvsnsdsfst
بارفیکس/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
بازده/pascspsgshsisl
بازنگذاردن/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
بازپرسی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
باغداری/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
بافه/pascspsgshsismsk
بالارفتن/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
بخرد/sasoslsdsfstsj
بدرستی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
بدرودگاه/pasasrsgshsislsdsesf
بدرودگوی/scspsmsgsisusdsf
بدزبانی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
بدقواره/scspsksgsisu
برازجان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
بروجردیان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
بلهوس/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
بهداشت/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
بودا/pasbsqsdsesfsvsn
بودیستی/scspsmsgsisu
بوزینه‌وار/sasoslsdsfstsj
بیخودانه/scspsksgsisu
بیرحمی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
بینوایان/sasosl
تاثیرپذیر/sasoslsdsfstsj
تجدیدنظر/pasasosdsesfslsj
تحدید/pasasosdsesfslsj
ترصدگاه/pasasrsgshsislsdsesf
تزلزل/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
تعلیمات/sasosl
تفاضلی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
تفریط/pasasosgshsislsj
تفلون/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
تقبل/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
تنبان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
تنداندیشی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
تنگستان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
تنگ‌چشم/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
تیمساری/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
تیمپانو/pasbsasqsdsesfsvsn
تیمچه/pascspsgshsismsk
جزم/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
جهان/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
جک/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
جگری/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
حادث/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
حزب/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
حلبیان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
حیفا/pasbsqsdsesfsvsn
خاطرخواه/pasasrsgshsislsdsesf
خاطرنشان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
خبره/scspsksgsisu
خرابه/pascspsgshsismsk
خرابکارانه/pascspsgshsismsk
خرمایی/scspsmsgsisusdsf
خرمی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
خلوتی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
خودفرما/sbsqsvsnsdsfst
خوشحال/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
دادیان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
دارالبیضا/pasbsqsdsesfsvsn
داستایوفسکی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
دربانی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
درزگیر/pasasosdsesfslsj
درمانگاه/pasasrsgshsislsdsesf
دشتان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
دلپذیری/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
دوالبازی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
دولتیار/sasoslsdsfstsj
دیتا/pasbsqsdsesfsvsn
دیرالتیام/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
دیریدن/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
ذغال/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
ذهنگرایی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
راحل/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
رادان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
رانده/scspsksgsisu
رخساری/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
ردا/pasbsqsdsesfsvsn
رضاپور/pasasosdsesfslsj
روانکاو/pasasrsdsesfsl
زبل/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
زدگان/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
زراعتیان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
زهراپور/pasasosdsesfslsj
زیرنویسی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
ساعتی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
سامرا/pasbsqsdsesfsvsn
ستامگری/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
ستایشگر/sasoslsdsfstsj
سرحدیان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
سرخمیدگی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
سرگرفته/scspsksgsisu
سرگروه/sasrslsgsistsu
سلسیوس/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
سماع/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
سهام/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
سوار/sasoslsdsfstsj
سوزیان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
سپیدجامه/pascspsgshsismsk
سیرک/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
شاهرگ/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
شروه/pascspsgshsismsk
شهابیان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
شهرداریها/sbsqsvsn
شوکی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
شکفتگی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
شکوه/pasasrsgshsislsdsesf
صبوریان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
صحراگردی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
صنوبرخرام/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
طاقک/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
عبدالمحمد/pasasosdsesfslsj
عسکرزاده/pascspsgshsismsk
عضویت/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
عمده/scspsksgsisu
عیادتگاه/pasasrsgshsislsdsesf
عین/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
غاصب/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
غیرکامل/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
فتحه/scspsksm
فتوحی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
فخرآباد/pasasosdsesfslsj
فراهان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
فرجیان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
فرزادنیا/pasbsqsdsesfsvsn
فرزندزایی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
فرستاده/scspsksgsisu
فیاضی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
قبال/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
قولنامه/pascspsgshsismsk
لبالب/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
لهو/sasrslsdsfstsj
مآلا/pasbsqsdsesfsvsn
ماتریالیسم/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
مادرزن/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
ماشاالله/pasasrsgshsislsdsesf
مامازن/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
متاخر/sasoslsdsfstsj
متحده/scspsksgsisu
متخطی/scspsmsgsisusdsf
مجتبوی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
مجیدپور/pasasosdsesfslsj
محرمه/scspsksgsisu
محصور/sasoslsdsfstsj
مخمر/pasasosdsesfslsj
مدافع/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
مدرسی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
مستملکه/scspsksgsisu
مشتبه/pascspsgshsisl
ملجا/pasbsqsdsesfsvsn
مندرجات/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
مندرس/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
منسوج/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
مهابهارت/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
موازی‌وار/sasoslsdsfstsj
موجک/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
مومنی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
مونتاژ/pasasosdsesfslsj
میانکوه/pasasrsgshsislsdsesf
میرآخور/pasasosdsesfslsj
میرسعیدی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
میو/pasbsasqsdsesfsvsn
می‌برانده/scspsksgsisu
می‌خراشیده/scspsksgsisu
می‌سگالیده/scspsksgsisu
ناطق/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
نامستدل/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
نامهیا/sbsqsvsnsdsfst
نداری/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
ندایی/scspsmsgsisusdsf
نرشته/scspsksgsisu
نمو/pasasrsdsesfsl
نمی‌بخشیده/scspsksgsisu
نمی‌رنجیده/scspsksgsisu
نمی‌کشانده/scspsksgsisu
نوشانیدن/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
نوکیسگی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
نگذاشتن/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
نیزک/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
نیفشانده/scspsksgsisu
هاوکینگ/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
هجابندی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
هجونامه/pascspsgshsismsk
هراسان/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
هرمزگانی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
همسنگی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
همچو/pasbsasqsdsesfsvsn
هندوانه/pascspsgshsismsk
هیو/pasbsasqsdsesfsvsn
وجدآمیز/sasoslsdsfstsj
ورنیامده/scspsksgsisu
ویچسلاو/pasasrsdsesfsl
پالاندوزی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
پاکو/pasbsasqsdsesfsvsn
پرمعما/sbsqsvsnsdsfst
پرنخوت/sasoslsgsisusjsdsfst
پرواز/pasasosdsesfslsj
پلوتونیم/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
پلیس/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
پورجهانگیر/pasasosdsesfslsj
پوچی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
چادردار/sasoslsdsfstsj
چراغی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
چراگاه/pasasrsgshsislsdsesf
چلومرغ/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
چهارتایی/scspsmsgsisusdsf
کارورزگاه/pasasrsgshsislsdsesf
کاستیلا/pasbsqsdsesfsvsn
کتاب/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
کرکوک/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
کلیوی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
کمالیه/pascspsgshsismsk
کوبریک/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
کوتاه/sasrslsgsistsu
کیمنتی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
گریخته/scspsksgsisu
گسترانیدن/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
گلابیان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
گنجوی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
یافتن/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
یاوری/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
یزدانیان/pasasosgshsislsjsdsesf
یساولی/pascspsgshsismsjsdsesf
